California statutes. Education Code
(a) On or before July 1, 2027, the commission shall, contingent upon an appropriation for these purposes in the annual Budget Act or another statute, develop a statewide data system that includes all of the following information for individuals serving in a noncertificated position for a local educational agency or in any position for a private school employer:

(1) The name, date of birth, and a unique identification number of the employee.

(2) The name of the school employer.

(3) The starting date, ending date, if applicable, and title for each school position held by the employee.

(4) The name of any local educational agency or private school employer that conducted an employee investigation for egregious misconduct that resulted in evidence for a substantiated report, as defined in Section 11165.12 of the Penal Code, on or after July 1, 2027.

(5) The date an investigation described in paragraph (4) was commenced.

(6) The date a substantiated report described in paragraph (4) was filed.

(b) Those local educational agencies and private school organizations that are responsible for employment, employee investigations, or hiring decisions shall, before hiring an individual for a noncertificated position at a local educational agency or any position at a private school employer, review the statewide data system established pursuant to
 subdivision (a) to determine whether an investigation resulted in a substantiated report pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(c) Within 30 calendar days of hiring an individual for a noncertificated position at a local educational agency or for any position at a private school employer, the local educational agency employer or private school employer shall provide to the statewide data system established pursuant to subdivision (a) the name and start date of the individual and the title of the position.

(d) Within 30 calendar days of an individual changing into, or adding, a noncertificated position with the same local educational agency employer or any position at a private school organization, the local educational agency employer or private school employer shall provide to the statewide data system established pursuant to subdivision (a) the name and start date of the
 individual and the title of the new or additional position.

(e) Within 10 calendar days of a noncertificated employee leaving a position at a local educational agency or any employee leaving a position at a private school, the local educational agency employer or private school employer shall provide to the statewide data system established pursuant to subdivision (a) the final date of employment or final date in the position.

(f) (1) Within 10 calendar days of the start of an investigation of egregious misconduct, the local educational agency employer or private school employer shall submit notice to the statewide data system established pursuant to subdivision (a) that an investigation was commenced.

(2) Statewide data system records shall indicate a pending status from the receipt of notice
 pursuant to paragraph (1) until the local educational agency employer or private school employer submits subsequent notice pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) Within 10 calendar days of the completion of an investigation of egregious misconduct, the local educational agency employer or private school employer shall submit notice stating the result of the investigation to the statewide data system.

(A) If an investigation of egregious misconduct results in a substantiated report as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 11165.12 of the Penal Code, a record of the investigation result shall be created in the statewide data system.

(B) If an investigation of egregious misconduct results in an unfounded report or inconclusive report as defined in Section 11165.12 of the Penal Code, no record of an investigation shall be
 created in the statewide data system.

(4) If a noncertificated employee leaves a local educational agency employer or any employee leaves a private school employer before the completion of an investigation of egregious misconduct, the local educational agency employer or private school employer shall submit notice of the change in employment status mid-investigation to the statewide data system to be included in the employee’s record.

(5) If a previously substantiated report is later determined by the governing board or body of the local educational agency, the private school, or an administrative law judge, if applicable, to be unfounded or inconclusive, the local educational agency or private school shall notify the commission within 10 days. Upon receiving the notification, the commission shall remove the report from the statewide data system.

(g) The commission shall serve only as the data administrator for records submitted to the statewide data system pursuant to this section. The commission shall ensure the secure operation and technical functionality of the statewide data system, but shall not be responsible for verifying the truthfulness or legal sufficiency of the information submitted by local educational agency employers or private school employers.

(h) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Egregious misconduct” has the same meaning as defined in Section 44932.

(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 460, Sec. 7.   (SB 848)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Interchange Between Certificated and Classified Positions [44060. - 44069.]

44060.

The purpose of this article is to provide a basis of determination as to what constitutes a supervisory or administrative classified position or a position requiring certification qualifications not clearly defined in other sections of this code; to provide an interchange of qualified personnel between the certificated and classified services of the public school systems; and to secure rights and benefits to employees moving between the two services, all to the end of assuring better educational systems for the students of the public school systems.

The provisions of this article are not intended, nor may they be construed, to invalidate any other sections of this code which were enacted prior to the enactment of this article, relating to positions requiring certification qualifications or the classified service covered in Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of Chapter 5 of this part, unless specifically provided herein. This article shall where appropriate apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of Chapter 5 of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44061.

If a person employed by the county superintendent of schools in a position requiring certification qualifications is assigned to a position under the same superintendent not requiring certification qualifications, the employee shall retain all sickness and injury, sabbatical leave, and other rights and benefits. All seniority and tenure rights accumulated by him at the time of assignment to the position not requiring certification qualifications shall be secured to him for a period of 39 months from the time of acceptance of the classified position. His return to certificated service at any time within the 39 months shall be treated as if there had not been an interruption in his certificated service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44062.

If a person employed by the county superintendent of schools in a position not requiring certification qualifications is assigned to a position under the same superintendent requiring certification qualifications, the employee shall retain all sick leave, vacation, and other rights and benefits accumulated by him at the time of assignment to the position requiring certification qualifications. All seniority and permanency rights shall be secured to such an employee for a period of 39 months from the date of his acceptance of the certificated position. Such an employee shall be eligible to return to and assume the duties of his prior classified position at any time during the 39 months and his return shall be treated as if there had not been an interruption in his classified service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44063.

If an employee of a school district, including a district having the merit system as outlined in Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of Chapter 5, employed in a position requiring certification qualifications is assigned to a position in the classified service of the same district, the employee shall retain all sickness and injury, sabbatical leave, and other rights and benefits. All seniority and tenure rights accumulated by the employee at the time of assignment to the position in the classified service shall be secured to the employee during the period of time he or she occupies a position in the classified service. The employee’s return to certificated service at any time shall be treated as if there had not been an interruption in his or her certificated service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1038, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44064.

If an employee of a school district, including a district having the merit system as outlined in Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of Chapter 5, employed in a position in the classified service is assigned to a position in the same district requiring certification qualifications, the employee shall retain all sick leave, vacation, and other rights and benefits accumulated by the employee at the time he or she is assigned to a position requiring certification qualifications. All seniority and permanency rights shall be secured to the employee during the period of time he or she occupies a position in the certificated service. The employee’s return to the classified service at any time shall be treated as if there had not been an interruption in his or her classified service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1038, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

44065.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), any person employed on or after July 1, 1963, by a school district, including a district having the merit system as outlined in Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of Chapter 5 of this part, or by a county superintendent of schools, in a position in which 50 percent or more of his or her duties performed during the school year, whether performed in a particular school or district or countywide, consist of rendering service in directing, coordinating, supervising or administering any portion or all of the types of functions listed below in this section shall hold a valid teaching or service credential as appropriate, whichever is designated in regulations adopted by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, authorizing the particular service.

The types of functions are:

(1) The work of instructors and the instructional program for pupils.

(2) Educational or vocational counseling, guidance and placement services.

(3) School extracurricular activities related to, and an outgrowth of, the instructional and guidance program of the school.

(4) Planning courses of study to be used in the public schools of the state. 

(5) The selection, collection, preparation, classification or demonstration of instructional materials of any course of study for use in the development of the instructional program in the schools of the state.

(6) Research connected with the evaluation and efficiency of the instructional program.

(7) The school health program.

(8) Activities connected with the enforcement of the laws relating to compulsory education, coordination of child welfare activities involving the school and the home, and the school adjustment of pupils.

(9) The school library services.

(10) The preparation and distribution of instructional materials.

(11) The in-service training of teachers, principals, or other certificated personnel.

(12) The interpretation and evaluation of the school instructional program.

(13) The examination, selection, or assignment of teachers, principals, or other certificated personnel involved in the instructional program.

(b) Any person who was employed by a district or by a county superintendent of schools before July 1, 1963, to perform any of the services designated by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing to require a supervision or administration credential, may continue to perform such services without possessing the credential otherwise required as long as he remains continuously employed to perform the same services in that county superintendent’s office or in that district in which he was employed on that date, or is continuously employed to perform the same services in a district which results from a reorganization involving the same district.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing board of any school district maintaining kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, or providing adult education classes, may employ for purposes of instructing apprentices duly registered with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards, persons holding any of the following valid credentials:

(1) A community college instructor credential.

(2) A community college limited service credential.

(3) A community college special limited service credential.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a school district or county superintendent of schools may hire persons who do not hold valid teaching or service credentials to perform the examination, selection or assignment of teachers, principals, or certificated personnel involved in the instructional program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44066.

A governing board of any school district or a county board of education or a county superintendent of schools or other appointing authority shall not require an employee or applicant to possess any certification, license, or other credential unless the possession of such a certification, license, or other credential is required by statute or is based upon a bona fide occupational qualification.

It is the intent of the Legislature that any person who had served in a position for which certification, license, or other credential not necessitated by statute or bona fide occupational qualification, had been required, and in a position which was designated by the governing board as a position requiring certification qualifications, shall be deemed to be an employee in a position requiring certification qualifications for as long as he or she holds such position and it is further the intent of the Legislature that such position shall be deemed to be a certificated position for as long as such person holds such position.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 699.)
-------------------------------------------

44067.

Any person who, on September 15, 1961, is serving in a position for which a credential was issued or certification qualifications required pursuant to Section 44286 prior to the repeal of such sections, shall be deemed to be an employee in a position requiring such credential or certification qualifications for as long as he holds such position after September 15, 1961.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44068.

Any person who, on June 30, 1965, was serving in a position requiring certification qualifications pursuant to the provisions of subdivisions (m), (n), and (o) of Section 13055 as amended by Chapter 840 of the Statutes of 1963, shall be deemed to be an employee in a position requiring certification qualifications for as long as he or she holds that position after January 1, 1987, and that position shall be deemed to be a certificated position for as long as this person holds that position.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 916, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

44068.5.

Any person who, on July 1, 1986, was serving in a position requiring certification qualifications pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 44065 as amended by Chapter 905 of the Statutes of 1985, shall be deemed to be an employee in a position requiring certification qualifications for as long as he or she holds that position after January 1, 1987, and that position shall be deemed to be a certificated position for as long as this person holds that position.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 916, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

44069.

(a) Any person who, on September 17, 1965, was serving in a position as business manager and had been assigned a title listed in Section 35028 shall be deemed to be an employee in a position requiring certification qualifications for so long as he holds such position in the same district.

(b) Any person who, on March 4, 1972, was serving in a position of business manager and that position had been declared, by the governing board, to be one requiring certification qualifications in accordance with the authority extended in this section prior to March 4, 1972, shall be deemed to be an employee in a position requiring certification qualifications for so long as he holds such position in the same district.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), on and after March 4, 1972, no person employed in a position of business manager shall be required to be credentialed and no title assignment, work, duty statement or other device, including but not limited to educational or other requirements of applicants, which may be established by the governing board, may be construed to require certification qualifications for any such position or reasonably related position.

(d) The governing board of any school district with less than 3,000 units of average daily attendance in the prior fiscal year may require any person employed in a position of business manager to be credentialed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Affirmative Action Employment [44100. - 44105.]

44100.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) Generally, California school districts employ a disproportionately low number of racial and ethnic minority classified and certificated employees and a disproportionately low number of women and members of racial and ethnic minorities in administrative positions.

(2) It is educationally sound for the minority student attending a racially impacted school to have available to him or her the positive image provided by minority classified and certificated employees. It is likewise educationally sound for the child from the majority group to have positive experiences with minority people, that can be provided, in part, by having minority classified and certificated employees at schools where the enrollment is largely made up of majority group students. It is also educationally important for students to observe that women as well as men can assume responsible and diverse roles in society.

(3) Past employment practices created artificial barriers and past efforts to promote additional action in the recruitment, employment, and promotion of women and minorities did not result in a substantial increase in employment opportunities for these persons.

(4) Lessons concerning democratic principles and the richness that racial diversity brings to our national heritage can be best taught by staffs composed of mixed races and ethnic groups working toward a common goal.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to do all of the following:

(1) Establish and maintain a policy of equal opportunity in employment for all persons.

(2) Prohibit discrimination on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, except as otherwise provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code, in every aspect of personnel policy and practice in the employment, development, advancement, and treatment of persons employed in the public school system.

(3) Promote the total realization of equal employment opportunity through a continuing affirmative action employment program.

(c) The Legislature recognizes that it is not enough to proclaim that public employers do not discriminate in employment, but that effort must also be made to build a community in which opportunity is equalized. It is the intent of the Legislature to require educational agencies to adopt and implement plans for increasing the numbers of women and minority persons at all levels of responsibility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 788, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

44101.

For the purposes of this article the following definitions apply:

(a) (1) “Affirmative action employment program” means planned activities designed to seek, hire, and promote persons who are underrepresented in the work force compared to their numbers in the population, including individuals with disabilities, women, and persons of minority racial and ethnic backgrounds. It is a conscious, deliberate step taken by a hiring authority to assure equal employment opportunity for all staff, both certificated and classified. These programs require the employer to make additional efforts to recruit, employ, and promote members of groups formerly excluded at the various levels of responsibility who are qualified or may become qualified through appropriate training or experience within a reasonable length of time. These programs should be designed to remedy the exclusion, whatever its cause.

(2) Affirmative action requires imaginative, energetic, and sustained action by each employer to devise recruiting, training, and career advancement opportunities that will result in an equitable representation of women and minorities in relation to all employees of the employer.

(b) “Goals and timetables” means projected new levels of employment of women and minority racial and ethnic groups to be attained on an annual schedule, given the expected turnover in the work force and the availability of persons who are qualified or may become qualified through appropriate training or experience within a reasonable length of time. Goals are not quotas or rigid proportions. They should relate both to the qualitative and quantitative needs of the employer.

(c) “Public education agency” means the Department of Education, each office of the county superintendent of schools, and the governing board of each school district in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 788, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

44103.

Each county superintendent of schools shall render assistance in developing and implementing affirmative action employment programs to elementary school districts under his jurisdiction which had fewer than 901 units of average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year, and to high school districts under his jurisdiction which had fewer than 301 units of average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year, and to unified school districts under his jurisdiction which had fewer than 1,501 units of average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1090.)
-------------------------------------------

44104.

The department, out of funds appropriated for such purposes, (1) shall provide assistance to local educational agencies in adopting and maintaining high-quality affirmative action programs and (2) develop and disseminate to public education agencies guidelines to assist the agencies in developing and implementing affirmative action employment programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 75.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44105.

The State Board of Education shall adopt all necessary rules and regulations to carry out the intent of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1090.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Reporting by School Employees of Improper Governmental Activities [44110. - 44114.]

44110.

This article shall be known and may be referred to as the Reporting by School Employees of Improper Governmental Activities Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

44111.

It is the intent of the Legislature that school employees and other persons disclose, to the extent not expressly prohibited by law, improper governmental activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

44112.

For the purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Employee” means a public school employee as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 3540.1 of the Government Code.

(b) “Illegal order” means any directive to violate or assist in violating a federal, state, or local law, rule, or regulation or an order to work or cause others to work in conditions outside of their line of duty that would unreasonably threaten the health or safety of employees or the public.

(c) “Improper governmental activity” means an activity by a public school agency or by an employee that is undertaken in the performance of the employee’s official duties, whether or not that activity is within the scope of his or her employment, and that meets either of the following descriptions:

(1) The activity violates a state or federal law or regulation, including, but not limited to, corruption, malfeasance, bribery, theft of government property, fraudulent claims, fraud, coercion, conversion, malicious prosecution, misuse of government property, or willful omission to perform duty.

(2) The activity is economically wasteful or involves gross misconduct, incompetency, or inefficiency.

(d) “Person” means any individual, corporation, trust, association, any state or local government, or any agency or instrumentality of any of the foregoing.

(e) “Protected disclosure” means a good faith communication that discloses or demonstrates an intention to disclose information that may evidence either of the following:

(1) An improper governmental activity.

(2) Any condition that may significantly threaten the health or safety of employees or the public if the disclosure or intention to disclose was made for the purpose of remedying that condition.

(f) “Public school employer” has the same meaning as in subdivision (k) of Section 3540.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

44113.

(a) An employee may not directly or indirectly use or attempt to use the official authority or influence of the employee for the purpose of intimidating, threatening, coercing, commanding, or attempting to intimidate, threaten, coerce, or command any person for the purpose of interfering with the right of that person to disclose to an official agent matters within the scope of this article.

(b) For the purpose of subdivision (a), “use of official authority or influence” includes promising to confer or conferring any benefit; affecting or threatening to affect any reprisal; or taking, directing others to take, recommending, processing, or approving any personnel action, including, but not limited to appointment, promotion, transfer, assignment, performance evaluation, suspension, or other disciplinary action.

(c) For the purpose of subdivision (a), “official agent” includes a school administrator, member of the governing board of a school district or county board of education, county superintendent of schools, or the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(d) An employee who violates subdivision (a) may be liable in an action for civil damages brought against the employee by the offended party.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize an individual to disclose information otherwise prohibited by or under law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

44114.

(a) A public school employee or applicant for employment with a public school employer who files a written complaint with his or her supervisor, a school administrator, or the public school employer alleging actual or attempted acts of reprisal, retaliation, threats, coercion, or similar improper acts prohibited by Section 44113 for having disclosed improper governmental activities or for refusing to obey an illegal order may also file a copy of the written complaint with the local law enforcement agency together with a sworn statement that the contents of the written complaint are true, or are believed by the affiant to be true, under penalty of perjury. The complaint filed with the local law enforcement agency shall be filed within 12 months of the most recent act of reprisal that is the subject of the complaint.

(b) A person who intentionally engages in acts of reprisal, retaliation, threats, coercion, or similar acts against a public school employee or applicant for employment with a public school employer for having made a protected disclosure is subject to a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and imprisonment in the county jail for a period not to exceed one year. Any public school employee, officer, or administrator who intentionally engages in that conduct shall also be subject to discipline by the public school employer. If no adverse action is instituted by the public school employer and it is determined that there is reasonable cause to believe that an act of reprisal, retaliation, threats, coercion, or similar acts prohibited by Section 44113 occurred, the local law enforcement agency may report the nature and details of the activity to the governing board of the school district or county board of education, as appropriate.

(c) In addition to all other penalties provided by law, a person who intentionally engages in acts of reprisal, retaliation, threats, coercion, or similar acts against a public school employee or applicant for employment with a public school employer for having made a protected disclosure shall be liable in an action for damages brought against him or her by the injured party. Punitive damages may be awarded by the court where the acts of the offending party are proven to be malicious. Where liability has been established, the injured party shall also be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees as provided by law. However, an action for damages shall not be available to the injured party unless the injured party has first filed a complaint with the local law enforcement agency.

(d) This section is not intended to prevent a public school employer, school administrator, or supervisor from taking, failing to take, directing others to take, recommending, or approving a personnel action with respect to a public school employee or applicant for employment with a public school employer if the public school employer, school administrator, or supervisor reasonably believes the action or inaction is justified on the basis of evidence separate and apart from the fact that the person has made a protected disclosure as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 44112.

(e) In any civil action or administrative proceeding, once it has been demonstrated by a preponderance of evidence that an activity protected by this article was a contributing factor in the alleged retaliation against a former, current, or prospective public school employee, the burden of proof shall be on the supervisor, school administrator, or public school employer to demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that the alleged action would have occurred for legitimate, independent reasons even if the public school employee had not engaged in protected disclosures or refused an illegal order. If the supervisor, school administrator, or public school employer fails to meet this burden of proof in an adverse action against the public school employee in any administrative review, challenge, or adjudication in which retaliation has been demonstrated to be a contributing factor, the public school employee shall have a complete affirmative defense in the adverse action.

(f) Nothing in this article shall be deemed to diminish the rights, privileges, or remedies of a public school employee under any other federal or state law or under an employment contract or collective bargaining agreement.

(g) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 68.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Teacher Credentialing [44200. - 44418.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [44200. - 44203.]

44200.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Teacher Credentialing Law of 1988” or “The Bergeson Act.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1360, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

44202.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission shall exercise authority over all services provided to pupils in grade 12 or below. It is not the intent of the Legislature to authorize the commission to issue credentials authorizing service in grades 13 and 14, or in any institution of higher education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 13.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

44203.

In this chapter, the following terms shall be defined as specified in this section:

(a) “Authorization” means the designation that appears on a credential, certificate, or permit that identifies the subjects and circumstances in which the holder of the credential, certificate, or permit may teach, or the services that the holder may render in the public schools of this state.

(b) (1) “Basic teaching credential” means either of the following:

(A) A credential that authorizes the holder to teach the subjects named on the credential, and for which possession of a baccalaureate degree from a regionally
 accredited institution of higher education and completion of a professional preparation program that includes student teaching or completion of a district internship program pursuant to Section 44325 are minimum requirements.

(B) A clear designated subjects teaching credential that authorizes the holder to teach the subjects named on the credential on a full-time basis if the holder also possesses a baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education and has passed the state basic skills proficiency test.

(2) A basic teaching credential meets the prerequisite teaching credential requirement for any other teaching, specialist, or service credential the commission is authorized to issue.

(c) “Beginning teacher assessment” means a process that has been adopted or approved by the commission
 for measuring the performances of the holders of preliminary teaching credentials in order to help them improve, and to determine whether their performances satisfy the commission’s standards of performance for earning the clear teaching credential.

(d) “Beginning teacher support” means a combination of assistance, guidance, encouragement, and diagnostic assessment that helps the holders of preliminary teaching credentials to fulfill their professional responsibilities effectively during the first year or two years of classroom teaching, and that satisfies standards of support adopted by the commission.

(e) “Institution of higher education” means an institution that grants baccalaureate or higher degrees.

(f) “Professional teacher certification requirements” means a policy of requiring each beginning teacher to
 complete a program of planned support and systematic assessment, as determined by the commission, as a condition for earning a clear teaching credential.

(g) “Regionally accredited” means either of the following:

(1) (A) An institution of higher education that has been accredited by the Accrediting Commission for Senior Colleges and Universities, the Western Association of Schools and Colleges, the Higher Learning Commission, the Middle States Commission on Higher Education, the Northwest Commission on Colleges and Universities, the New England Commission of Higher Education, or the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools Commission on Colleges.

(B) A community or junior college that confers baccalaureate degrees and is regionally accredited by an accrediting agency listed in subparagraph
 (A) or by the Accrediting Commission for Community and Junior Colleges of the Western Association of Schools and Colleges may meet this definition.

(2) An institution of higher education that held preaccreditation status at the time the degree of an applicant for a credential was conferred, if the institution achieved full regional accreditation status within five years of earning preaccreditation status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 1.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Commission on Teacher Credentialing [44210. - 44239.]

44210.

(a) There is hereby established in the state government the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, to consist of 15 voting members, 14 of whom shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate, as specified in paragraphs (2) to (9), inclusive. The commission shall consist of the following members:

(1) The Superintendent or the Superintendent’s designee.

(2) (A) Six
 practicing teachers from public elementary and secondary schools in California, except as provided in subparagraph (B).

(B) Of the six members appointed pursuant to this paragraph, one member may be a teacher holding a commission-issued child development teacher permit who teaches at a state-funded preschool program or prekindergarten program licensed pursuant to Chapter 19 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) One person who is employed on the basis of a services credential other than an administrative services credential.

(4) One member of the governing board of a school district.

(5) One early childhood faculty member representing the early childhood higher education systems who teaches at either (A) an early childhood or child development baccalaureate degree program at one of the California State University or University of California campuses or (B) an associate degree program in one of the California Community Colleges’ early childhood education programs. The Governor shall make the initial appointment pursuant to this paragraph upon the occurrence of the first vacancy of a public representative position, as described in paragraph (6), that occurs on or after January 1, 2026. 

(6) Three representatives of the